Nevada, session 83, AB6.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 427A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. There is hereby established the Fetal Alcohol Spectrum
Disorder Treatment Assistance Program within the Division to
serve as the primary program within the Department for persons
with a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder and to provide and
coordinate the provision of services to persons diagnosed or
determined, including, without limitation, through the use of a
standardized assessment, to have fetal alcohol spectrum disorders
through the age of 13 years. The Fetal Alcohol Spectrum Disorder
Treatment Assistance Program must be administered by the
Autism Treatment Assistance Program created by NRS 427A.875.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. To the extent that money is available, the Fetal Alcohol
Spectrum Disorder Treatment Assistance Program may:
(a) Prescribe an application process for parents and guardians
of persons with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders described in
subsection 1 to participate in the Program.
(b) Provide for the development of a plan of treatment for
persons who participate in the Program.
(c) Promote the use of evidence-based treatments which are
cost effective and have been proven to improve treatment of fetal
alcohol spectrum disorders.
(d) Educate parents and guardians of persons with fetal
alcohol spectrum disorders on fetal alcohol spectrum disorders
and the assistance that may be provided by the parent or guardian
to improve treatment outcomes.
(e) Establish and use a system for assessing persons with fetal
alcohol spectrum disorders to determine a baseline to measure the
progress of and prepare a plan for the treatment of such persons.
(f) Assist parents and guardians of persons with fetal alcohol
spectrum disorders in obtaining public services that are available
for the treatment of fetal alcohol spectrum disorders.
3. As used in this section, “fetal alcohol spectrum disorder”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 432B.0655.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)